Utah statutes.
78A-7-214.   Laws, ordinances, and reference materials provided by counties,
cities, and towns.
Each county, city, or town shall provide and keep current for each justice
court in its jurisdiction a copy of the motor vehicle laws of Utah,
appropriate copies of the Utah code, the justice court manual published by the
state court administrator, state laws affecting local government, the county,
city, or town ordinances, and other legal reference materials as determined to
be necessary by the judge.
